District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

2-308.14

False claims liability, treble damages, costs, and civil penalties; exceptions.

Recodified as § 2-381.02.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 814, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687

History